Illinois, session 104th, HB1406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 5-915 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-915)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-717 and 8103-787)9    Sec. 5-915. Expungement of juvenile law enforcement and 10juvenile court records. 11    (0.05) (Blank).12    (0.1)(a) The Illinois State Police and all law enforcement 13agencies within the State shall automatically expunge, on or 14before January 1 of each year, except as described in 15paragraph (c) of this subsection (0.1), all juvenile law 16enforcement records relating to events occurring before an 17individual's 18th birthday if:18        (1) one year or more has elapsed since the date of the 19    arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in the 20    records;21        (2) no petition for delinquency or criminal charges 22    were filed with the clerk of the circuit court relating to 23    the arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in   HB1406- 2 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1    the records; and2        (3) 6 months have elapsed since the date of the arrest 3    without an additional subsequent arrest or filing of a 4    petition for delinquency or criminal charges whether 5    related or not to the arrest or law enforcement 6    interaction documented in the records.7    (b) If the law enforcement agency is unable to verify 8satisfaction of conditions (2) and (3) of this subsection 9(0.1), records that satisfy condition (1) of this subsection 10(0.1) shall be automatically expunged if the records relate to 11an offense that if committed by an adult would not be an 12offense classified as a Class 2 felony or higher, an offense 13under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code 14of 2012, or an offense under Section 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 1512-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961. 16    (c) If the juvenile law enforcement record was received 17through a public submission to a statewide student 18confidential reporting system administered by the Illinois 19State Police, the record will be maintained for a period of 5 20years according to all other provisions in this subsection 21(0.1). 22    (0.15) If a juvenile law enforcement record meets 23paragraph (a) of subsection (0.1) of this Section, a juvenile 24law enforcement record created:25        (1) prior to January 1, 2018, but on or after January 26    1, 2013 shall be automatically expunged prior to January   HB1406- 3 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1    1, 2020; 2        (2) prior to January 1, 2013, but on or after January 3    1, 2000, shall be automatically expunged prior to January 4    1, 2023; and 5        (3) prior to January 1, 2000 shall not be subject to 6    the automatic expungement provisions of this Act. 7    Nothing in this subsection (0.15) shall be construed to 8restrict or modify an individual's right to have the person's 9juvenile law enforcement records expunged except as otherwise 10may be provided in this Act. 11    (0.2)(a) Upon dismissal of a petition alleging delinquency 12or upon a finding of not delinquent, the successful 13termination of an order of supervision, or the successful 14termination of an adjudication for an offense which would be a 15Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a petty or 16business offense if committed by an adult, the court shall 17automatically order the expungement of the juvenile court 18records and juvenile law enforcement records. The clerk shall 19deliver a certified copy of the expungement order to the 20Illinois State Police and the arresting agency. Upon request, 21the State's Attorney shall furnish the name of the arresting 22agency. The expungement shall be completed within 60 business 23days after the receipt of the expungement order.24    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 25the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 26writing that certain information is needed for a pending   HB1406- 4 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 2information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 3retained until the statute of limitations for the felony has 4run. If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or the 5chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in writing 6that certain information is needed with respect to an internal 7investigation of any law enforcement office, that information 8and information identifying the juvenile may be retained 9within an intelligence file until the investigation is 10terminated or the disciplinary action, including appeals, has 11been completed, whichever is later. Retention of a portion of 12a juvenile's law enforcement record does not disqualify the 13remainder of a juvenile's record from immediate automatic 14expungement.15    (0.3)(a) Upon an adjudication of delinquency based on any 16offense except a disqualified offense, the juvenile court 17shall automatically order the expungement of the juvenile 18court and law enforcement records 2 years after the juvenile's 19case was closed if no delinquency or criminal proceeding is 20pending and the person has had no subsequent delinquency 21adjudication or criminal conviction. The clerk shall deliver a 22certified copy of the expungement order to the Illinois State 23Police and the arresting agency. Upon request, the State's 24Attorney shall furnish the name of the arresting agency. The 25expungement shall be completed within 60 business days after 26the receipt of the expungement order. In this subsection   HB1406- 5 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1(0.3), "disqualified offense" means any of the following 2offenses: Section 8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 310-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 411-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 12-2, 12-3.05, 512-3.3, 12-4.4a, 12-5.02, 12-6.2, 12-6.5, 12-7.1, 12-7.5, 612-20.5, 12-32, 12-33, 12-34, 12-34.5, 18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 718-6, 19-3, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.5, 824-3A, 24-3B, 24-3.2, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 29D-14.9, 29D-20, 30-1, 931-1a, 32-4a, or 33A-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or 10subsection (b) of Section 8-1, paragraph (4) of subsection (a) 11of Section 11-14.4, subsection (a-5) of Section 12-3.1, 12paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of Section 12-6, 13subsection (a-3) or (a-5) of Section 12-7.3, paragraph (1) or 14(2) of subsection (a) of Section 12-7.4, subparagraph (i) of 15paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 12-9, subparagraph 16(H) of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1.6, 17paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 25-1, or subsection 18(a-7) of Section 31-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.19    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 20the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 21writing that certain information is needed for a pending 22investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 23information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 24retained in an intelligence file until the investigation is 25terminated or for one additional year, whichever is sooner. 26Retention of a portion of a juvenile's juvenile law   HB1406- 6 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1enforcement record does not disqualify the remainder of a 2juvenile's record from immediate automatic expungement. 3    (0.4) Automatic expungement for the purposes of this 4Section shall not require law enforcement agencies to 5obliterate or otherwise destroy juvenile law enforcement 6records that would otherwise need to be automatically expunged 7under this Act, except after 2 years following the subject 8arrest for purposes of use in civil litigation against a 9governmental entity or its law enforcement agency or personnel 10which created, maintained, or used the records. However, these 11juvenile law enforcement records shall be considered expunged 12for all other purposes during this period and the offense, 13which the records or files concern, shall be treated as if it 14never occurred as required under Section 5-923. 15    (0.5) Subsection (0.1) or (0.2) of this Section does not 16apply to violations of traffic, boating, fish and game laws, 17or county or municipal ordinances. 18    (0.6) Juvenile law enforcement records of a plaintiff who 19has filed civil litigation against the governmental entity or 20its law enforcement agency or personnel that created, 21maintained, or used the records, or juvenile law enforcement 22records that contain information related to the allegations 23set forth in the civil litigation may not be expunged until 24after 2 years have elapsed after the conclusion of the 25lawsuit, including any appeal. 26    (0.7) Officer-worn body camera recordings shall not be   HB1406- 7 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1automatically expunged except as otherwise authorized by the 2Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act. 3    (1) Whenever a person has been arrested, charged, or 4adjudicated delinquent for an incident occurring before a 5person's 18th birthday that if committed by an adult would be 6an offense, and that person's juvenile law enforcement and 7juvenile court records are not eligible for automatic 8expungement under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3), the 9person may petition the court at any time at no cost to the 10person for expungement of juvenile law enforcement records and 11juvenile court records relating to the incident and, upon 12termination of all juvenile court proceedings relating to that 13incident, the court shall order the expungement of all records 14in the possession of the Illinois State Police, the clerk of 15the circuit court, and law enforcement agencies relating to 16the incident, but only in any of the following circumstances:17        (a) the minor was arrested and no petition for 18    delinquency was filed with the clerk of the circuit court;19        (a-5) the minor was charged with an offense and the 20    petition or petitions were dismissed without a finding of 21    delinquency; 22        (b) the minor was charged with an offense and was 23    found not delinquent of that offense;24        (c) the minor was placed under supervision under 25    Section 5-615, and the order of supervision has since been 26    successfully terminated; or  HB1406- 8 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1        (d) the minor was adjudicated for an offense which 2    would be a Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a 3    petty or business offense if committed by an adult.4    (1.5) At no cost to the person, the Illinois State Police 5shall allow a person to use the Access and Review process, 6established in the Illinois State Police, for verifying that 7the person's juvenile law enforcement records relating to 8incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday eligible 9under this Act have been expunged. 10    (1.6) (Blank).11    (1.7) (Blank).12    (1.8) (Blank). 13    (2) Any person whose delinquency adjudications are not 14eligible for automatic expungement under subsection (0.3) of 15this Section may petition the court at no cost to the person to 16expunge all juvenile law enforcement records relating to any 17incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday which 18did not result in proceedings in criminal court and all 19juvenile court records with respect to any adjudications 20except those based upon first degree murder or an offense 21under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 if the person is 22required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act 23at the time the person petitions the court for expungement; 24provided that 2 years have elapsed since all juvenile court 25proceedings relating to the person have been terminated and 26the person's commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice   HB1406- 9 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1under this Act has been terminated.2    (2.5) If a minor is arrested and no petition for 3delinquency is filed with the clerk of the circuit court at the 4time the minor is released from custody, the youth officer, if 5applicable, or other designated person from the arresting 6agency, shall notify verbally and in writing to the minor or 7the minor's parents or guardians that the minor shall have an 8arrest record and shall provide the minor and the minor's 9parents or guardians with an expungement information packet, 10information regarding this State's expungement laws including 11a petition to expunge juvenile law enforcement and juvenile 12court records obtained from the clerk of the circuit court.13    (2.6) If a minor is referred to court, then, at the time of 14sentencing, dismissal of the case, or successful completion of 15supervision, the judge shall inform the delinquent minor of 16the minor's rights regarding expungement and the clerk of the 17circuit court shall provide an expungement information packet 18to the minor, written in plain language, including information 19regarding this State's expungement laws and a petition for 20expungement, a sample of a completed petition, expungement 21instructions that shall include information informing the 22minor that (i) once the case is expunged, it shall be treated 23as if it never occurred, (ii) the minor shall not be charged a 24fee to petition for expungement, (iii) once the minor obtains 25an expungement, the minor may not be required to disclose that 26the minor had a juvenile law enforcement or juvenile court   HB1406- 10 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1record, and (iv) if petitioning the minor may file the 2petition on the minor's own or with the assistance of an 3attorney. The failure of the judge to inform the delinquent 4minor of the minor's right to petition for expungement as 5provided by law does not create a substantive right, nor is 6that failure grounds for: (i) a reversal of an adjudication of 7delinquency; (ii) a new trial; or (iii) an appeal.8    (2.7) (Blank).9    (2.8) (Blank).10    (3) (Blank). 11    (3.1) (Blank).12    (3.2) (Blank).13    (3.3) (Blank).14    (4) (Blank). 15    (5) (Blank).16    (5.5) Whether or not expunged, records eligible for 17automatic expungement under subdivision (0.1)(a), (0.2)(a), or 18(0.3)(a) may be treated as expunged by the individual subject 19to the records.20    (6) (Blank).21    (6.5) The Illinois State Police or any employee of the 22Illinois State Police shall be immune from civil or criminal 23liability for failure to expunge any records of arrest that 24are subject to expungement under this Section because of 25inability to verify a record. Nothing in this Section shall 26create Illinois State Police liability or responsibility for   HB1406- 11 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1the expungement of juvenile law enforcement records it does 2not possess. 3    (7) (Blank). 4    (7.5) (Blank).5    (8) The expungement of juvenile law enforcement or 6juvenile court records under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3) 7of this Section shall be funded by appropriation by the 8General Assembly for that purpose. 9    (9) (Blank). 10    (10) (Blank).11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-752, eff. 1-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 136-30-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-717 and 15103-787)16    Sec. 5-915. Expungement of juvenile law enforcement and 17juvenile court records. 18    (0.05) (Blank).19    (0.1)(a) The Illinois State Police and all law enforcement 20agencies within the State shall automatically expunge, on or 21before January 1 of each year, except as described in 22paragraph (c) of this subsection (0.1), all juvenile law 23enforcement records relating to events occurring before an 24individual's 18th birthday if:25        (1) one year or more has elapsed since the date of the   HB1406- 12 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1    arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in the 2    records;3        (2) no petition for delinquency or criminal charges 4    were filed with the clerk of the circuit court relating to 5    the arrest or law enforcement interaction documented in 6    the records; and7        (3) 6 months have elapsed since the date of the arrest 8    without an additional subsequent arrest or filing of a 9    petition for delinquency or criminal charges whether 10    related or not to the arrest or law enforcement 11    interaction documented in the records.12    (b) If the law enforcement agency is unable to verify 13satisfaction of conditions (2) and (3) of this subsection 14(0.1), records that satisfy condition (1) of this subsection 15(0.1) shall be automatically expunged if the records relate to 16an offense that if committed by an adult would not be an 17offense classified as a Class 2 felony or higher, an offense 18under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or Criminal Code 19of 2012, or an offense under Section 12-13, 12-14, 12-14.1, 2012-15, or 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961. 21    (c) If the juvenile law enforcement record was received 22through a public submission to a statewide student 23confidential reporting system administered by the Illinois 24State Police, the record will be maintained for a period of 5 25years according to all other provisions in this subsection 26(0.1).   HB1406- 13 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1    (0.15) If a juvenile law enforcement record meets 2paragraph (a) of subsection (0.1) of this Section, a juvenile 3law enforcement record created:4        (1) prior to January 1, 2018, but on or after January 5    1, 2013 shall be automatically expunged prior to January 6    1, 2020; 7        (2) prior to January 1, 2013, but on or after January 8    1, 2000, shall be automatically expunged prior to January 9    1, 2023; and 10        (3) prior to January 1, 2000 shall not be subject to 11    the automatic expungement provisions of this Act. 12    Nothing in this subsection (0.15) shall be construed to 13restrict or modify an individual's right to have the person's 14juvenile law enforcement records expunged except as otherwise 15may be provided in this Act. 16    (0.2)(a) Upon dismissal of a petition alleging delinquency 17or upon a finding of not delinquent, the successful 18termination of an order of supervision, or the successful 19termination of an adjudication for an offense which would be a 20Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a petty or 21business offense if committed by an adult, the court shall 22automatically order the expungement of the juvenile court 23records and juvenile law enforcement records. The clerk shall 24deliver a certified copy of the expungement order to the 25Illinois State Police and the arresting agency. Upon request, 26the State's Attorney shall furnish the name of the arresting   HB1406- 14 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1agency. The expungement shall be completed within 60 business 2days after the receipt of the expungement order.3    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 4the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 5writing that certain information is needed for a pending 6investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 7information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 8retained until the statute of limitations for the felony has 9run. If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or the 10chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in writing 11that certain information is needed with respect to an internal 12investigation of any law enforcement office, that information 13and information identifying the juvenile may be retained 14within an intelligence file until the investigation is 15terminated or the disciplinary action, including appeals, has 16been completed, whichever is later. Retention of a portion of 17a juvenile's law enforcement record does not disqualify the 18remainder of a juvenile's record from immediate automatic 19expungement.20    (0.3)(a) Upon an adjudication of delinquency based on any 21offense except a disqualified offense or an attempt to commit 22a disqualified offense, the juvenile court shall automatically 23order the expungement of the juvenile court and law 24enforcement records 2 years after the juvenile's case was 25closed if no delinquency or criminal proceeding is pending and 26the person has had no subsequent delinquency adjudication or   HB1406- 15 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1criminal conviction. On the date that the minor's sentence 2ends or the date that the court enters an order committing the 3minor to the Department of Juvenile Justice, the juvenile 4court judge shall schedule a date to enter the automatic 5expungement order. The minor must be notified but shall not be 6required to be present for the scheduled court date when 7automatic expungement is to be ordered. If the minor is not yet 8eligible on the originally scheduled date, the court shall 9schedule a subsequent date to enter the automatic expungement 10order. The clerk shall deliver a certified copy of the 11expungement order to the Illinois State Police and the 12arresting agency. Upon request, the State's Attorney shall 13furnish the name of the arresting agency. The expungement 14shall be completed within 60 business days after the receipt 15of the expungement order. In this subsection (0.3), 16"disqualified offense" means any of the following offenses: 17Section 8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 10-1, 10-2, 1810-3, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-9, 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 1911-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 12-2, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 2012-4.4a, 12-5.02, 12-6.2, 12-6.5, 12-7.1, 12-7.5, 12-20.5, 2112-32, 12-33, 12-34, 12-34.5, 18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-6, 2219-3, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.5, 24-3A, 2324-3B, 24-3.2, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 29D-14.9, 29D-20, 30-1, 31-1a, 2432-4a, or 33A-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or subsection (b) 25of Section 8-1, paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 2611-14.4, subsection (a-5) of Section 12-3.1, paragraph (1),   HB1406- 16 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1(2), or (3) of subsection (a) of Section 12-6, subsection 2(a-3) or (a-5) of Section 12-7.3, paragraph (1) or (2) of 3subsection (a) of Section 12-7.4, subparagraph (i) of 4paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 12-9, subparagraph 5(H) of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1.6, 6paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 25-1, or subsection 7(a-7) of Section 31-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.8    (b) If the chief law enforcement officer of the agency, or 9the chief law enforcement officer's designee, certifies in 10writing that certain information is needed for a pending 11investigation involving the commission of a felony, that 12information, and information identifying the juvenile, may be 13retained in an intelligence file until the investigation is 14terminated or for one additional year, whichever is sooner. 15Retention of a portion of a juvenile's juvenile law 16enforcement record does not disqualify the remainder of a 17juvenile's record from immediate automatic expungement. 18    (0.4) Automatic expungement for the purposes of this 19Section shall not require law enforcement agencies to 20obliterate or otherwise destroy juvenile law enforcement 21records that would otherwise need to be automatically expunged 22under this Act, except after 2 years following the subject 23arrest for purposes of use in civil litigation against a 24governmental entity or its law enforcement agency or personnel 25which created, maintained, or used the records. However, these 26juvenile law enforcement records shall be considered expunged   HB1406- 17 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1for all other purposes during this period and the offense, 2which the records or files concern, shall be treated as if it 3never occurred as required under Section 5-923. 4    (0.5) Subsection (0.1) or (0.2) of this Section does not 5apply to violations of traffic, boating, fish and game laws, 6or county or municipal ordinances. 7    (0.6) Juvenile law enforcement records of a plaintiff who 8has filed civil litigation against the governmental entity or 9its law enforcement agency or personnel that created, 10maintained, or used the records, or juvenile law enforcement 11records that contain information related to the allegations 12set forth in the civil litigation may not be expunged until 13after 2 years have elapsed after the conclusion of the 14lawsuit, including any appeal. 15    (0.7) Officer-worn body camera recordings shall not be 16automatically expunged except as otherwise authorized by the 17Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera Act. 18    (1) Whenever a person has been arrested, charged, or 19adjudicated delinquent for an incident occurring before a 20person's 18th birthday that if committed by an adult would be 21an offense, and that person's juvenile law enforcement and 22juvenile court records are not eligible for automatic 23expungement under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3), the 24person may petition the court at any time at no cost to the 25person for expungement of juvenile law enforcement records and 26juvenile court records relating to the incident and, upon   HB1406- 18 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1termination of all juvenile court proceedings relating to that 2incident, the court shall order the expungement of all records 3in the possession of the Illinois State Police, the clerk of 4the circuit court, and law enforcement agencies relating to 5the incident, but only in any of the following circumstances:6        (a) the minor was arrested and no petition for 7    delinquency was filed with the clerk of the circuit court;8        (a-5) the minor was charged with an offense and the 9    petition or petitions were dismissed without a finding of 10    delinquency; 11        (b) the minor was charged with an offense and was 12    found not delinquent of that offense;13        (c) the minor was placed under supervision under 14    Section 5-615, and the order of supervision has since been 15    successfully terminated; or16        (d) the minor was adjudicated for an offense which 17    would be a Class B misdemeanor, Class C misdemeanor, or a 18    petty or business offense if committed by an adult.19    (1.5) At no cost to the person, the Illinois State Police 20shall allow a person to use the Access and Review process, 21established in the Illinois State Police, for verifying that 22the person's juvenile law enforcement records relating to 23incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday eligible 24under this Act have been expunged. 25    (1.6) (Blank).26    (1.7) (Blank).  HB1406- 19 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1    (1.8) (Blank). 2    (2) Any person whose delinquency adjudications are not 3eligible for automatic expungement under subsection (0.3) of 4this Section may petition the court at no cost to the person to 5expunge all juvenile law enforcement records relating to any 6incidents occurring before the person's 18th birthday which 7did not result in proceedings in criminal court and all 8juvenile court records with respect to any adjudications 9except those based upon first degree murder or an offense 10under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 if the person is 11required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act 12at the time the person petitions the court for expungement; 13provided that 2 years have elapsed since all juvenile court 14proceedings relating to the person have been terminated and 15the person's commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice 16under this Act has been terminated.17    (2.5) If a minor is arrested and no petition for 18delinquency is filed with the clerk of the circuit court at the 19time the minor is released from custody, the youth officer, if 20applicable, or other designated person from the arresting 21agency, shall notify verbally and in writing to the minor or 22the minor's parents or guardians that the minor shall have an 23arrest record and shall provide the minor and the minor's 24parents or guardians with an expungement information packet, 25information regarding this State's expungement laws including 26a petition to expunge juvenile law enforcement and juvenile   HB1406- 20 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1court records obtained from the clerk of the circuit court.2    (2.6) If a minor is referred to court, then, at the time of 3sentencing, dismissal of the case, or successful completion of 4supervision, the judge shall inform the delinquent minor of 5the minor's rights regarding expungement and the clerk of the 6circuit court shall provide an expungement information packet 7to the minor, written in plain language, including information 8regarding this State's expungement laws and a petition for 9expungement, a sample of a completed petition, expungement 10instructions that shall include information informing the 11minor that (i) once the case is expunged, it shall be treated 12as if it never occurred, (ii) the minor shall not be charged a 13fee to petition for expungement, (iii) once the minor obtains 14an expungement, the minor may not be required to disclose that 15the minor had a juvenile law enforcement or juvenile court 16record, and (iv) if petitioning the minor may file the 17petition on the minor's own or with the assistance of an 18attorney. The failure of the judge to inform the delinquent 19minor of the minor's right to petition for expungement as 20provided by law does not create a substantive right, nor is 21that failure grounds for: (i) a reversal of an adjudication of 22delinquency; (ii) a new trial; or (iii) an appeal.23    (2.6-1) A trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) 24of subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, 25may petition for vacation and expungement or immediate sealing 26of his or her juvenile court records and juvenile law   HB1406- 21 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1enforcement records relating to events that resulted in the 2victim's adjudication of delinquency for an offense if 3committed by an adult would be a violation of the criminal laws 4occurring before the victim's 18th birthday upon the 5completion of his or her juvenile court sentence if his or her 6participation in the underlying offense was a result of human 7trafficking under Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 8a severe form of trafficking under the federal Trafficking 9Victims Protection Act. 10    (2.7) (Blank).11    (2.8) (Blank).12    (3) (Blank). 13    (3.1) (Blank).14    (3.2) (Blank).15    (3.3) (Blank).16    (4) (Blank). 17    (5) (Blank).18    (5.5) Whether or not expunged, records eligible for 19automatic expungement under subdivision (0.1)(a), (0.2)(a), or 20(0.3)(a) may be treated as expunged by the individual subject 21to the records.22    (6) (Blank).23    (6.5) The Illinois State Police or any employee of the 24Illinois State Police shall be immune from civil or criminal 25liability for failure to expunge any records of arrest that 26are subject to expungement under this Section because of   HB1406- 22 -LRB104 03233 RLC 13255 b1inability to verify a record. Nothing in this Section shall 2create Illinois State Police liability or responsibility for 3the expungement of juvenile law enforcement records it does 4not possess. 5    (7) (Blank). 6    (7.5) (Blank).7    (8) The expungement of juvenile law enforcement or 8juvenile court records under subsection (0.1), (0.2), or (0.3) 9of this Section shall be funded by appropriation by the 10General Assembly for that purpose. 11    (9) (Blank). 12    (10) (Blank).13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-752, eff. 1-1-23; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 156-30-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-717, 16eff. 1-1-25; 103-787, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-7-24.) 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act.